Illinois, session 104th, SB3469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Self-Service Storage Facility Act is 5amended by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (770 ILCS 95/4)  (from Ch. 114, par. 804)7    Sec. 4. Enforcement of lien. An owner's lien as provided 8for in Section 3 of this Act for a claim which has become due 9may be satisfied as follows:10    (A) The occupant shall be notified.11    (B) The notice shall be delivered: 12        (1) in person; or 13        (2) by verified mail or by electronic mail to the last 14    known address of the occupant. 15    (C) The notice shall include:16        (1) An itemized statement of the owner's claim showing 17    the sum due at the time of the notice and the date when the 18    sum became due;19        (2) The name of the facility, address, telephone 20    number, date, time, location, and manner of the lien sale, 21    including the website where the online bidding may take 22    place, if applicable, and the occupant's name and unit 23    number;  SB3469- 2 -LRB104 18218 JRC 31657 b1        (3) A notice of denial of access to the personal 2    property, if such denial is permitted under the terms of 3    the rental agreement, which provides the name, street 4    address, and telephone number of the owner, or his 5    designated agent, whom the occupant may contact to respond 6    to this notice;7        (3.5) Except as otherwise provided by a rental 8    agreement and until a lien sale, the exclusive care, 9    custody, and control of all personal property stored in 10    the leased self-service storage space remains vested in 11    the occupant. No bailment or higher level of liability is 12    created if the owner over-locks the occupant's lock, 13    thereby denying the occupant access to the storage space. 14    Rent and other charges related to the lien continue to 15    accrue during the period of time when access is denied 16    because of non-payment;17        (4) A demand for payment within a specified time not 18    less than 14 days after delivery of the notice;19        (5) A conspicuous statement that unless the claim is 20    paid within the time stated in the notice, the personal 21    property will be advertised for sale or other disposition, 22    and will be sold or otherwise disposed of at a specified 23    time and place.24    (D) Any notice made pursuant to this Section shall be 25presumed delivered when it is deposited with the United States 26Postal Service, and properly addressed with postage prepaid or   SB3469- 3 -LRB104 18218 JRC 31657 b1sent by electronic mail and the owner receives a receipt of 2delivery to the occupant's last known address, except if the 3owner does not receive a receipt of delivery for the notice 4sent by electronic mail, the notice is presumed delivered when 5it is sent to the occupant by verified mail to the occupant's 6last known mailing address.7    (E) After the expiration of the time given in the notice, 8an advertisement of the sale or other disposition shall be 9published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper 10of general circulation where the self-service storage facility 11is located, or once in a newspaper of general circulation 12where the self-service storage facility is located and once on 13a publicly accessible online website that regularly advertises 14or conducts personal property auctions or sales. The 15advertisement shall include:16        (1) The name of the facility, address, telephone 17    number, date, time, location, and manner of lien sale and 18    the occupant's name and unit number.19        (2) (Blank).20        (3) The sale or other disposition shall take place not 21    sooner than 15 days after the first publication. If there 22    is no newspaper of general circulation where the 23    self-service storage facility is located, the 24    advertisement shall be posted at least 10 days before the 25    date of the sale or other disposition in not less than 6 26    conspicuous places in the neighborhood where the   SB3469- 4 -LRB104 18218 JRC 31657 b1    self-service storage facility is located.2    (F) Any sale or other disposition of the personal property 3shall conform to the terms of the notification as provided for 4in this Section.5    (G) Any sale or other disposition of the personal property 6shall be held at the self-service storage facility, or at the 7nearest suitable place to where the personal property is held 8or stored. A sale under this Section shall be deemed to be held 9at the self-service storage facility where the personal 10property is stored if the sale is held on a publicly accessible 11online website.12    (G-5) If the property upon which the lien is claimed is a 13motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft and rent or other 14charges related to the property remain unpaid or unsatisfied 15for 60 days or the occupant is in default of the rental 16agreement for 60 days, the owner may have the property towed 17from the self-service storage facility. If a motor vehicle, 18trailer, or watercraft is towed, the owner shall not be liable 19for any damage to the motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft, 20once the tower takes possession of the property. After the 21motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft is towed, the owner may 22pursue other collection options against the delinquent 23occupant for any outstanding debt. If the owner chooses to 24sell a motor vehicle, aircraft, mobile home, moped, 25motorcycle, snowmobile, trailer, or watercraft, the owner 26shall contact the Secretary of State and any other   SB3469- 5 -LRB104 18218 JRC 31657 b1governmental agency as reasonably necessary to determine the 2name and address of the title holder or lienholder of the item, 3and the owner shall notify every identified title holder or 4lienholder of the time and place of the proposed sale. The 5owner is required to notify the holder of a security interest 6only if the security interest is filed under the name of the 7person signing the rental agreement or an occupant. An owner 8who fails to make the lien searches required by this Section is 9liable only to valid lienholders injured by that failure as 10provided in Section 3.11    (H) Before any sale or other disposition of personal 12property pursuant to this Section, the occupant may pay the 13amount necessary to satisfy the lien, and the reasonable 14expenses incurred under this Section, and thereby redeem the 15personal property. Upon receipt of such payment, the owner 16shall return the personal property, and thereafter the owner 17shall have no liability to any person with respect to such 18personal property.19    (I) A purchaser in good faith of the personal property 20sold to satisfy a lien, as provided for in Section 3 of this 21Act, takes the property free of any rights of persons against 22whom the lien was valid, despite noncompliance by the owner 23with the requirements of this Section.24    (J) In the event of a sale under this Section, the owner 25may satisfy his lien from the proceeds of the sale, but shall 26hold the balance, if any, for delivery on demand to the   SB3469- 6 -LRB104 18218 JRC 31657 b1occupant. If the occupant does not claim the balance of the 2proceeds within one year of the date of sale, it shall become 3the property of the owner without further recourse by the 4occupant.5    (K) The lien on any personal property created by this Act 6shall be terminated as to any such personal property which is 7sold or otherwise disposed of pursuant to this Act and any such 8personal property which is removed from the self-service 9storage facility.10    (L) If 3 or more bidders who are unrelated to the owner are 11in attendance at a sale held under this Section, the sale and 12its proceeds are deemed to be commercially reasonable.13(Source: P.A. 103-1003, eff. 1-1-25; 104-139, eff. 1-1-26.)